Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,116
Unenforceable liens; title quieted without offer to redeem.

When any lien or apparent lien on any real estate shall not be enforceable by reason of lapse of time, the owner of such real estate shall be entitled to have his title thereto quieted against such unenforceable lien or apparent lien without redeeming or offering to redeem therefrom; Provided, the owner or owners or their privies in estate of such real estate shall have been in possession of the same during the period of the statute of limitations.

Laws 1921, c. 130, § 5, p. 542;

C.S.1922, § 5680;

C.S.1929, § 76-405;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,116.

Party must be owner and in possession of land to quiet title against lien barred by lapse of time. Hadley v. Platte Valley Cattle Co., 143 Neb. 482, 10 N.W.2d 249 (1943).

Decree quieting title to land encumbered by a mortgage may be obtained upon proper ground without alleging payment of mortgage. McLaughlin v. Nelson, 113 Neb. 308, 202 N.W. 871 (1925).

A court of equity in quieting title clouded by void judicial proceedings, should impose reasonable conditions on plaintiff. Westerfield v. Howell, 88 Neb. 463, 129 N.W. 986 (1911); McCabe v. Equitable Land Co., 88 Neb. 453, 129 N.W. 1018 (1911).

Court should require person asking equitable relief to do equity. Kerr v. McCreary, 84 Neb. 315, 120 N.W. 1117 (1909).